Utah statutes.
4-39-105.   Prohibited activities.

(1)  Except as provided in this title or in the rules of the department made pursuant to this title, a person may not:

(a)  acquire, import, or possess domesticated elk intended for use in a domesticated elk facility;

(b)  transport domesticated elk to or from a domesticated elk facility;

(c)  propagate domesticated elk in a domesticated elk facility; or

(d)  harvest, transfer, possess, or sell domesticated elk or domesticated elk products from a domesticated elk facility.

(2)  Releasing domesticated elk into the wild is prohibited.

